Utah statutes.
67-16-8.   Participation in transaction involving business as to which public officer or employee has interest -- Exceptions.

(1)  No public officer or public employee shall participate in his official capacity or receive compensation in respect to any transaction between the state or any of its agencies and any business entity as to which such public officer or public employee is also an officer, director, or employee or owns a substantial interest, unless disclosure has been made as provided under Section 67-16-7.

(2)  A concession contract between an agency, political subdivision, or the state and a certified professional golf association member who is a public employee or officer does not violate the provisions of Subsection (1) or Title 10, Chapter 3, Part 13.

